Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB4.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 156 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Department" means the Kentucky Department of Education; and
(b) "Principal" means a person who:
1. Is the primary administrator and instructional leader of a public school or program;
2. Supervises students and school employees; and
3. Is selected by the district's superintendent pursuant to KRS 160.345.
(2) There is hereby established the principal leadership development practicum to provide all new principals
within the first four (4) years of experience in the position with leadership development training. It is the
intent of the General Assembly to ensure that a school district or principal incurs no cost for the
participation in the practicum and the principal receives a stipend toward the cost of the third year of the
practicum. The Kentucky Department of Education shall develop and operate the practicum, subject to the
following provisions:
(a) The practicum shall operate based on cohorts of new principals and offer four (4) years of leadership
development training with specific requirements in each year. The department shall annually
establish a calendar for the operation of the practicum;
(b) Each year's cohort of new principals shall consist of those people who first became principals by
September 1 of each year;
(c) The department shall establish the minimum requirements for successful completion of each year,
including hours of instruction or specific work products;
(d) The first and second year of the practicum shall provide professional learning and mentorship
supports to new principals, subject to the following:
1. The mentors shall have significant and successful experience as a principal and may be
currently employed in a school district or retired. The mentors shall provide ongoing support
to the new principals through the first and second school year with regular personal sessions
to provide individualized support to the new principal;
2. The mentorship shall also provide the cohort of new principals an opportunity to build a peer
support network;
3. The professional learning provided by the department shall be aligned to the most recent
professional standards adopted by the National Policy Board for Educational Administration
and include, at a minimum, the following topics:
a. Personnel evaluation and feedback;
b. School-based decision making and school councils;
c. Implementation of instructional leadership, high-quality instructional materials, and
curriculum alignment;
d. Assessment and accountability;
e. Multitiered systems of support;
f. Services for exceptional children and youth; and
g. School safety; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
4. Professional learning under subparagraph 3. of this paragraph shall utilize any existing
trainings required in administrative regulation or statute or developed by the department.
Additional professional learning developed by the department shall first be approved by the
Kentucky Board of Education;
(e) The third year of the practicum shall require, as funds are available, that the new principal
participate in an intensive leadership program during the summer with follow-up sessions
throughout the following year. The leadership program shall be established by the department in
partnership with the Kentucky Chamber Foundation. A new principal shall be exempted from the
requirements of this paragraph if:
1. The new principal misses the intensive leadership program during the summer due to illness
or an emergency;
2. The absence is approved by the superintendent of the school district in which the new
principal is employed; and
3. The new principal completes an alternative program established by the department; and
(f) The fourth year of the practicum shall not be mandatory but shall provide high-level leadership
training options for new principals. The department shall establish the standards for training
providers and the trainings under this paragraph, including the number of hours required. The
department shall maintain a list of training providers who are eligible to provide the high-level
leadership training and make it available to new principals; and
(g) After the fourth year, each principal shall continue leadership development through the effective
instructional leadership program established in Section 2 of this Act.
(3) A principal may submit the participant hours of instruction that the principal earns under this section
during a year toward the twenty-one (21) participant hours required by the effective instructional leadership
program established in Section 2 of this Act. The department shall grant program credit for the verified
hours the principal submits.
(4) If a person discontinues serving as a principal during the first four (4) years of service and subsequently
returns to a principal position, then that person shall continue the new principal program for the year in
which the person was previously participating.
(5) The principal leadership development practicum required under this section shall begin on July 1, 2027, for
the 2027-2028 school year with a cohort of principals with less than one (1) year of experience in the
position. Subsequent cohorts shall be admitted as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(6) The Kentucky Board of Education may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A for the operation of the section.
Section 2. KRS 156.101 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of this section is to encourage and require the maintenance and development of effective
instructional leadership in the public schools of the Commonwealth and to recognize that principals, with the
assistance of assistant principals, supervisors of instruction, guidance counselors, and directors of special
education, have the primary responsibility for instructional leadership in the schools to which they are
assigned.
(2) As used in[For the purpose of] this section, "instructional leader" means[shall be defined as] an employee of
the public schools of the Commonwealth employed as a principal, assistant principal, supervisor of instruction,
guidance counselor, director of special education, or other administrative position deemed by the Education
Professional Standards Board to require an administrative certificate.
(3) In order to carry out the purpose of this section, the Kentucky Board of Education shall establish a statewide
program to improve and maintain the quality[ and effectiveness] of effective instructional leadership in the
public schools of the Commonwealth.
(4) The effective instructional leadership[instructional leader improvement] program shall contain the following
provisions:
(a) Each instructional leader employed by the public schools of the Commonwealth shall participate in a
continuing intensive training program designed especially for instructional leaders;

CHAPTER 154 3
(b) Each instructional leader shall annually complete an intensive training program approved by the
Kentucky Board of Education to include no fewer than twenty-one (21) participant hours of instruction.
Hours completed by participants in the principal leadership development practicum under Section 1
of this Act may be substituted to satisfy this requirement;
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall prescribe specific criteria for the training program. The
Kentucky Department of Education may contract for specific training with qualified agencies or
institutions or approve programs offered by training providers, including local district training
programs, except that the department shall ensure the requirements of paragraph (d) of this subsection
are met; and
(d) Annually, each local district superintendent shall report to the Kentucky Department of Education any
instructional leader who fails to complete the training requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection
and shall place the leader on probation for one (1) year. The Department of Education shall verify
completion of the required training. If the required training for the prior year and the current year is not
completed during the probationary period, the Department of Education shall forward the information
to the Education Professional Standards Board, which shall revoke the instructional leader's certificate.
(5) The Kentucky Department of Education shall ensure that training options in human resource management and
conflict resolution techniques are available to education leaders throughout the state.
(6) This section shall be known as the ["]Effective Instructional Leadership Act.["]
Section 3. KRS 161.027 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Education Professional Standards Board, pursuant to KRS 161.028, shall by administrative regulation
establish requirements for a preparation program in institutions of higher education for all new applicants for
principal certification and establish criteria for admission to the program.
(2) The Education Professional Standards Board and the Council on Postsecondary Education shall evaluate the
preparation programs for principals and maintain only those institutional programs that can demonstrate both
the quality and the capability to enroll adequate numbers of students to justify the resources necessary for
maintenance of a quality program.
(3) The Education Professional Standards Board shall develop or select appropriate assessments for applicants
seeking certification as principals, including an assessment of the ability to apply knowledge, instructional
leadership, management, and supervision skills.
(4) The Education Professional Standards Board shall establish the minimum score for successful completion of
assessments and shall establish a reasonable fee to be charged applicants for the actual cost of administration
of the assessments. The Education Professional Standards Board shall provide for confidentiality of
assessment scores.
(5) [The Education Professional Standards Board shall develop an internship program which shall provide for the
supervision, assistance, and assessment of beginning principals and assistant principals. The internship shall
not be required of applicants who have completed, within a ten (10) year period prior to making application, at
least two (2) years of successful experience as a principal in a school situation. The Education Professional
Standards Board, by administrative regulation, shall establish the internship program.
(6) ]The certification of principals shall require the successful completion of the examinations required by
subsection (3) of this section. A one (1) year certificate may be given to a person who has:
(a) A comparable certificate from another state; or
(b) All other qualifications except the assessments and is selected as a principal or assistant principal in a
district where the superintendent certifies to the Education Professional Standards Board that there is a
limited number of applicants to meet the requirements.
Upon successful completion of the assessments, a certificate shall be issued for an additional four (4) years. A
person employed in Kentucky as a principal or assistant principal who was certified in another state and
practiced in that state for two (2) or more years is exempt from taking the assessment described in subsection
(3)(a) of this section.
(6)[(7)] Upon successful completion of the approved preparation program and the assessments, the Education
Professional Standards Board shall issue to the applicant a statement of eligibility for internship valid for five
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) years. If the applicant does not gain employment as a principal[participate in an internship program]
within the five (5) year period, the applicant shall reestablish eligibility by repeating and passing the
assessments in effect at that time or by completing a minimum of six (6) graduate hours, directly related to
instructional leadership, management, or supervision, at a regionally or nationally accredited institution. The
option for renewal through completion of graduate hours shall be available only for the first reestablishment of
eligibility. Upon obtaining employment for an internship position as principal or assistant principal within the
period of eligibility, the applicant shall be issued the appropriate one (1) year certificate for the position.
(7)[(8)] [All applicants for principal certification, after successfully completing the assessments, shall
successfully complete the internship program described in subsection (5) of this section for principal
certification. If the principal's or assistant principal's internship performance is judged to be less than
satisfactory pursuant to administrative regulations developed by the Education Professional Standards Board,
the applicant for principal certification shall be provided with an opportunity to repeat the internship one (1)
time if the applicant is employed by a school district as a principal or assistant principal.
(9) ]Following successful completion of the first year of principalship[internship program], the principal
certificate shall be extended for four (4) years. Renewal of the certificate shall require the completion of a
continuing education requirement as prescribed by the Education Professional Standards Board.
Section 4. KRS 156.492 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Education may enter into an agreement with any building and construction trade
organization to develop a training program for school counselors providing services to students in the
Commonwealth. The purpose of the training program shall be to promote building and construction trades and
training facilities available to students by making school counselors aware of what is available to students
participating in the building and construction trade. The training program shall include information relating to:
(a) The pay and benefits available to people who work in the building and construction trades; and
(b) Job opportunities, pre-apprenticeships, apprenticeships, and pathways within the building and
construction trade industry.
(2) The participating trade organization shall ensure ample opportunities for school counselors that serve grades
seven (7) through twelve (12) to complete the training created under subsection (1) of this section annually and
shall bear all costs associated with the training. The participating trade organization may choose to offer
professional development opportunities to teachers who serve students in grades seven (7) through twelve
(12), if resources are available for this purpose.
(3) The department shall include the training program created in this section on the electronic consumer bulletin
board created pursuant to KRS 156.095(8) if requested by the training program.
(4) A school counselor serving students in grades seven (7) through twelve (12) may complete four (4) hours of
training developed under this section which shall count towards the twenty-one (21) hours required annually
pursuant to KRS 156.101(4)(b)[2].
(5) Local boards of education or school-based decision making councils may incorporate this training as part of
the four (4) days of professional development required pursuant to KRS 158.070(3)(a) for teachers who serve
students in grades seven (7) through twelve (12) if offered by the participating trade organization.
Section 5. KRS 160.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section and Sections 7 and 8 of this Act, "large school district" means a school district that
has more than three hundred thousand (300,000) inhabitants.
(2) Each school district shall be under the management and control of a board of education consisting of five (5)
members[, except in counties containing a city of the first class wherein a merger pursuant to KRS 160.041
shall have been accomplished which shall have seven (7) members elected from the divisions and in the
manner prescribed by KRS 160.210(5),] to be known as the "Board of Education of ...., Kentucky." Each
board of education shall be a body politic and corporate with perpetual succession. It may sue and be sued;
make contracts; expend funds necessary for liability insurance premiums and for the defense of any civil
action brought against an individual board member in his or her official or individual capacity, or both, on
account of an act made in the scope and course of his or her performance of legal duties as a board member;
purchase, receive, hold, and sell property; issue its bonds to build and construct improvements; and do all
things necessary to accomplish the purposes for which it is created. Each board of education shall elect a

CHAPTER 154 5
chair[chairman] and vice chair[chairman] from its membership in a manner and for a term prescribed by the
board not to exceed two (2) years.
(3)[(2)] No board of education shall participate in any financing of school buildings, school improvements,
appurtenances thereto, or furnishing and equipment, including education technology equipment without:
(a) First establishing the cost of the project in advance of financing, based on the receipt of advertised,
public, and competitive bids for such project, in accordance with KRS Chapter 424; and
(b) Establishing the cost of financing in advance of the sale of any bonds, certificates of participation in any
leases, or other evidences of financial commitments issued by or on behalf of such board. Any bonds,
leases, participations, or other financial arrangements shall not involve a final commitment of the board
until the purchaser or lender involved shall have been determined by public advertising in accordance
with KRS Chapter 424.
(4)[(3)] No board of education shall make a mortgage, lien, or other encumbrance upon any school building
owned by the board, or transfer title to any such school building as part of any financing arrangement, without
the specific approval of the Department of Education, and without the transaction being entered into pursuant
to a detailed plan or procedure specifically authorized by Kentucky statute.
(5)[(4)] Without the approval of the Department of Education, no board may lease, as lessee, a building or
public facility that has been or is to be financed at the request of the board or on its behalf through the issuance
of bonds by another public body or by a nonprofit corporation serving as an agency and instrumentality of the
board, or by a leasing corporation. Any lease, participation, or other financial arrangement shall not involve a
final commitment of the board unless and until the purchaser or lender involved in same shall have been
determined by public advertising in accordance with KRS Chapter 424. No transaction shall be entered into by
the board except upon the basis of public advertising and competitive bidding in accordance with KRS Chapter
424.
(6)[(5)] A school district may issue general obligation bonds in accordance with KRS Chapter 66.
(7)[(6)] Rental payments due by a board under a lease approved by the Department of Education in accordance
with subsection (5)[(4)] of this section, and debt service payments under a general obligation bond issued in
accordance with this section, shall be due and payable not less than ten (10) days prior to the interest due date
for the bonds, notes, or other debt obligations issued to finance the building or public facility. If a board fails
to make a rental payment when due under a lease or a debt service payment when due for a general obligation
bond issue, upon notification to the Department of Education by the paying agent, bond registrar, or trustee for
the bonds not less than three (3) days prior to the interest due date, the Department of Education shall withhold
or intercept any funds then due the board to the extent of the amount of the required payment on the bonds and
remit the amount to the paying agent, bond registrar, or trustee as appropriate. Thereafter, the Department of
Education shall resolve the matter with the board and adjust remittances to the board to the extent of the
amount paid by the Department of Education on the board's behalf.
(8)[(7)] Bonds, notes, or leases negotiated to provide education technology shall not be sold for longer than
seven (7) years or the useful life of the equipment as established by the state technology master plan,
whichever is less.
(9)[(8)] Notwithstanding any requirements of public advertising, competitive bidding, or approval by the
Department of Education, or any administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS 156.160(1)(o), a
local board may authorize the transfer or sale of the district's real or personal property to another governmental
or quasi-governmental agency in exchange for money or a similar type of property that equals or exceeds the
fair market value of the district property as determined by an independent appraisal conducted by:
(a) An individual or organization not affiliated with the district or its officers or employees, using a
generally accepted national or professional standard; or
(b) A district's officers or employees using a nationally published valuation of property based on the most
recent edition of the publication.
Section 6. KRS 160.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All elections for members of boards of education shall be in even numbered years, for a term of four (4)
years[, except as provided in KRS 160.210(5)]. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the
elections shall be held at the regular November election.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) In each even numbered year, there shall be held an election in every county and independent district to fill the
membership of the boards of education for the terms that will expire on the first Monday in January following,
and the regularly elected members shall hold office for four (4) years and until their successors are elected and
have qualified.
(3) Any independent school district embracing a designated city may, at the discretion of its board of education,
hold its election of board members at its public school building on the first Saturday in May. The election shall
be held by three (3) officers appointed by the board of education and the expenses of the election shall be paid
from the treasury of the school district. In all other respects the provisions of this chapter relating to holding
elections for board members shall apply.
(4) [In counties containing a city of the first class, wherein a merger pursuant to KRS 160.041 shall have been
accomplished, the terms of the members shall be as provided in KRS 160.210(5). Elected members of such
boards, excepting those boards of education representing ten percent (10%) or less of the student population of
the county serving at the effective date of such a merger shall continue to serve until their term expires, but no
appointments shall be made to fill vacancies. The terms of office of members of boards of education
representing ten percent (10%) or less of the student population of the county shall expire on the effective date
of the merger.
(5) ]As used in this section, "designated city" means a city classified as a city of the fifth class as of January 1,
2014, under the city classification system in effect prior to January 1, 2015. The Department of Education
shall, on or before January 1, 2015, create an official registry listing the cities that qualify as a "designated
city" under this section and shall publish that registry on its website[Web site].
Section 7. KRS 160.180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son, and daughter.
(2) A person shall only be eligible for membership on a board of education if the person:
(a) Has attained the age of twenty-four (24) years;
(b) Has been a citizen of Kentucky for at least three (3) years preceding the election and is a voter of the
district for which he or she is elected;
(c) Has completed at least the twelfth grade or has been issued a High School Equivalency Diploma, as
evidenced by:
1. An affidavit signed under penalty of perjury certifying completion of the twelfth grade or the
equivalent that has been filed with the nominating petition required by KRS 118.315; or
2. A transcript evidencing completion of the twelfth grade or the results of a twelfth grade
equivalency examination that has been filed with the nominating petition required by KRS
118.315;
(d) Does not hold any elective federal, state, county, or city office;
(e) Is not, at the time of his or her election, directly or indirectly interested in the sale to the board of books,
stationery, or any other property, materials, supplies, equipment, or services for which school funds are
expended;
(f) Has not been removed from membership on a board of education for cause;[ and]
(g) Does not have a relative employed by the school district, in the case of a person elected after July 13,
1990. This shall not apply to a board member holding office on July 13, 1990, whose relative was not
initially hired by the district during the tenure of the board member; and
(h) For boards of education of large school districts, is not an employee of a board of education in the
Commonwealth whose position requires work on more than one hundred (100) days per year.
(3) (a) A member of a board of education shall be subject to removal from office pursuant to KRS 415.050 and
415.060 if, after the election the member:
1. Becomes interested in any contract with or claims against the board, of the kind mentioned in
subsection (2)(e) of this section;
2. Moves his or her residence from the division for which he or she was chosen;

CHAPTER 154 7
3. Attempts to influence the employment of any school employee, except the superintendent or
school board attorney;
4. Is convicted of a felony;
5. Performs acts of malfeasance in performance of duties prescribed by law;
6. Willfully misuses, converts, or misappropriates public property or funds; or
7. Does anything that would render the member ineligible for reelection.
(b) In accordance with KRS 7.410, the Office of Education Accountability shall have the duty and
responsibility to investigate current local board of education members for allegations of conduct
prohibited by paragraph (a) of this subsection. After review and investigation, the Office of Education
Accountability shall refer appropriate matters to the Attorney General.
(4) A member of a board of education shall be eligible for reelection unless he or she becomes disqualified.
(5) The annual in-service training requirements for all members of boards of education in office as of December
31, 2014, shall be as follows:
(a) Twelve (12) hours for members with zero to three (3) years of experience;
(b) Eight (8) hours for members with four (4) to seven (7) years of experience; and
(c) Four (4) hours for members with eight (8) or more years of experience.
The Kentucky Board of Education shall identify the criteria for fulfilling this requirement.
(6) (a) For all members of boards of education who begin their initial service on or after January 1, 2015, the
in-service training requirements shall be:
1. Twelve (12) hours for members with zero to eight (8) years of experience each year, which shall
include a minimum of:
a. One (1) hour of ethics training each year; and
b. One (1) hour of open meetings and open records training within the first twelve (12)
months of initial service and at least once every four (4) years thereafter; and
2. Eight (8) hours for members with more than eight (8) years of experience each year, which shall
include a minimum of:
a. One (1) hour of ethics training each year; and
b. One (1) hour of open meetings and open records training at least once every four (4)
years.
(b) Training topics for members under this subsection with less than two (2) years of consecutive service
shall include three (3) hours of finance and one (1) hour of superintendent evaluation within the first
two (2) years of service. The Kentucky Board of Education shall identify criteria for fulfilling this
requirement.
Section 8. KRS 160.210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In independent school districts, the members of the school board shall be elected from the district at large. In
county school districts, members shall be elected from divisions.
(2) The board of education of each county school district shall[, not later than July 1, 1940,] divide its district into
five (5) divisions containing integral voting precincts and as equal in population insofar as is practicable. In[
first] dividing the county district into divisions the board shall, if more than one (1) of its members reside in
one (1) division, determine by lot which member from that division shall represent that division, and which
members shall represent the divisions in which no member resides. The members so determined to represent
divisions in which no member resides shall be considered the members from those divisions until their terms
expire, and thereafter the members from those divisions shall be nominated and elected as provided in KRS
160.200 and 160.220 to 160.250.
(3) Any changes made in division boundary lines shall be to make divisions as equal in population and containing
integral voting precincts insofar as is practical. No change may be made in division boundary lines less than
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
five (5) years after the last change in any division lines, except in case of merger of districts, a change in
territory due to annexation, or to allow compliance with KRS 117.055(2).
(4) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, if one hundred (100) residents of a
county school district division petition the Kentucky Board of Education stating that the school district
divisions are not divided as nearly equal in population as can reasonably be expected, the chief state
school officer shall cause an investigation to determine the validity of the petition, the investigation to
be completed within thirty (30) days after receipt of the petition.
(b) If the investigation reveals the school district to be unequally divided according to population, the
Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the chief state school officer, shall order
the local board of education to make changes in school district divisions as are necessary to equalize
population within the five (5) school divisions.
(c) If any board fails to comply with the order of the Kentucky Board of Education within thirty (30) days
or prior to August 1 in any year in which any members of the board are to be elected, members shall be
elected from the district at large until the order of the Kentucky Board of Education has been complied
with.
(d) No change shall be made in the boundary of any division under the provisions of this subsection after
August 1 in the year in which a member of the school board is to be elected from any division.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section:[, ]
(a) In large school districts[counties containing a city of the first class wherein a merger pursuant to KRS
160.041 shall have been accomplished], there shall be five (5)[ Seven (7)] divisions as equal in
population as is practicable, with members elected from divisions. To be eligible to be elected from a
division, a candidate shall[must] reside in that division. The county school district divisions[, based
upon 1970 United States Census Bureau Reports on total population by census tracts] for Jefferson
County, Kentucky, shall be as provided in Section 9 of this Act[follows: Division One shall include
census tracts 1-28; Division Two shall include census tracts 29-35, 47-53, 57-74, 80-84, 93, 129, 130;
Division Three shall include census tracts 75-79, 85-88, 98-106, 107.01, 108; Division Four shall
include census tracts 121.01, 123-128; Division Five shall include census tracts 36-46, 56, 90, 120,
121.02, 122; Division Six shall include census tracts 54, 55, 91, 92, 94, 95, 110.02, 113, 114, 117.01,
117.02, 118, 119; Division Seven shall include census tracts 89, 96, 97, 107.02, 109, 110.01, 111, 112,
115, 116, 117.03, 131, 132.]; and
(b) The terms of the members[ to be elected], KRS 160.044 notwithstanding, shall be four (4) years[ and
the election for the initial four (4) year terms shall be as follows: The election of the members from
Divisions Two, Four and Seven shall be held at the next regular November election following the
effective date of the merger pursuant to KRS 160.041, and the election of the members from Divisions
One, Three, Five and Six shall be held at the regular November election two (2) years thereafter].
(6) [In counties containing cities of the first class, ]Responsibility for the establishment and[or] the changing of
school board division boundaries of large school districts shall be with the county[local] board of education,
subject to the review and approval of the county board of elections. Where division and census tract
boundaries do not coincide with existing election precinct boundaries, school board divisions shall be redrawn
to comply with precinct boundaries. In no instance shall precinct boundaries be redrawn nor shall a precinct be
divided to accommodate the drawing of school board division lines. [Precinct boundaries nearest existing
school board division boundaries shall become the new division boundary. ]All changes under this
section[statute] shall be completed on or before[ January 1, 1979, and on or before] January 1 in any[
succeeding] year in which a member of the[ school] board is to be elected from any division. A record of all
changes in division lines shall be kept in the offices of the county board of education and the county board of
elections. The board of education shall publish all changes pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. A copy of the
newspaper in which the notice is published shall be filed with the chief state school officer within ten (10)
days following its publication.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The divisions for the Jefferson County Board of Education shall be based upon the precinct identification
codes and precinct boundaries maintained by the Jefferson County Clerk’s Office as of March 19, 2026.
The divisions shall be composed of the following territory in Jefferson County that is part of the Jefferson
County School District:

CHAPTER 154 9
(a) Division One shall consist of the following territory:
G140 G141 G143 G144 G145 G146 G150
G156 G161 G169 G174 G177 G186 G189
G190 G191 G192 G193 J173 J174 K110
K111 K112 K113 K114 K116 K117 K122
K123 K125 K140 K142 K150 K155 K159
K160 K161 K162 K163 K164 K165 K167
K169 K170 K171 K172 K173 K176 K177
K178 K179 L169 L170 L171 L172 L173
L174 L175 L176 L195 L203 L204 L205
L206 L207 L208 L216 L217 L218 L219
L220 M107 M110 M121 M129 M181 M185
M186 M188 M189 M191 M192 M193 M194
M195 M196 M197 M198 M199 M201 M202
M203 N101 N102 N103 N104 N105 N106
N107 N115 N117 N128 N134 N135 N136
N145 N147 N148 N152 N157 N162 N163
N164 N165 N167 N171 N173 N179 O105
O107 O112 O117 O119 O121 O127 O135
O136 O145 O146 O147 O150 O151 O152
O153 O154
(b) Division Two shall consist of the following territory:
C123 C124 C128 C130 C131 C137 C138
D114 D116 D117 D120 D122 D132 D137
D139 D141 D142 D146 D147 D148 D149
D150 D151 D155 D156 D157 D158 D159
D160 D161 D163 D164 D165 D166 D167
E139 E141 E142 E143 E144 E154 E155
E157 E162 E171 E173 E175 E176 E183
E185 E188 E189 G157 G158 G159 G160
G163 G164 G165 G170 G171 G172 G173
G178 G179 G180 G181 G182 G183 G184
G185 G187 G188 G194 G195 G196 H117
H120 H121 H164 K153 L165 L167 L168
L177 L178 L179 L180 L181 L182 L183
L184 L186 L187 L188 L189 L192 L193
L194 L196 L197 L198 L199 L201 L209
L210 L211 L212 L213 L215 M159 M176
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
M177 M178 M179 M210 M213 N151 N153
N170 N174 N177 N181 Q107 Q137 Q138
Q140 Q142 Q146 Q150 Q151 Q156 Q162
Q163 Q164 Q165 Q166 Q167 Q168 Q169
V101 V106 V133 V134
(c) Division Three shall consist of the following territory:
B153 B158 B159 B161 B172 B183 B191
B192 B193 B198 B199 B201 B202 D152
D153 D154 D168 D169 D171 D172 D173
E145 E181 E190 E191 E192 E193 E194
E195 E196 E197 E198 E199 E201 E202
E203 E204 E205 E206 E207 F106 F145
F151 F152 F153 F158 F163 F164 F167
F169 F170 F171 F172 F176 F179 F180
F184 F188 F189 F190 F191 F192 G175
G176 N130 N178 S116 S118 S125 S126
S128 S129 S130 S139 S140 S143 S144
S153 S160 S161 S165 S166 S167 S168
S169 S170 S171 S172 S173 S174 S175
S176 S177 S178 S179 V104 V105 V107
V108 V109 V110 V111 V112 V113 V114
V116 V118 V120 V121 V123 V125 V126
V127 V129 V130 V131 V136 V137 V138
V139 V140 V141 V142 V143 V144 V145
V146
(d) Division Four shall consist of the following territory:
A146 A147 A148 A149 A150 A151 A154
C101 C102 C103 C104 C105 C106 C108
C109 C110 C111 C113 C115 C126 C129
C134 C152 C153 C154 C155 C156 C157
H123 H124 H125 H126 H130 H154 H155
H163 H165 H166 H167 H168 H171 H176
H177 H178 H180 H181 H182 H185 I169
J105 J108 J111 J113 J117 J119 J120
J140 J163 J165 J166 J168 J169 J170
J171 J172 K118 K119 K131 K134 K135
K137 K141 K143 K151 K152 K154 K156
K157 K158 K166 K168 K174 K175 K180
L166 L185 M123 M124 M131 M168 M180

CHAPTER 154 11
M182 M183 M184 M211 M212 N154 N155
N156 N158 N160 N161 N166 N168 N169
N172 N175 N176 N180 O109 O111 O113
O124 O126 O130 O131 O138 O148 O149
Q103 Q127 Q148 Q153 Q154 Q155 Q161
Q170
(e) Division Five shall consist of the following territory:
A107 A108 A111 A113 A114 A115 A118
A119 A121 A124 A125 A126 A127 A128
A129 A134 A136 A139 A142 A145 A152
A153 B124 B134 B149 B154 B160 B162
B163 B166 B168 B169 B173 B175 B177
B184 B187 B188 B189 B190 B194 B195
B196 B197 H138 H144 H147 H169 H173
H175 H183 H184 I126 I130 I133 I135
I141 I144 I145 I146 I151 I152 I153
I154 I157 I158 I159 I160 I161 I162
I163 I164 I165 I166 I167 I168 I170
I171 I172 I173 I174 I175 J122 J123
J135 J137 J138 J145 J150 J152 J153
J156 J157 J158 J159 J160 J162 J164
O141 O144 Q109 Q115 Q125 Q132 Q141
Q143 Q144 Q145 Q171 Q172
(2) If any precinct or part of a precinct that is part of Jefferson County School District is not identified in
subsection (1) of this section, the county board of elections shall add that territory to a contiguous division.
All actions taken by the county board of elections under this subsection shall be to ensure that minimal
changes are made that allow the divisions to fall within a five percent (5%) population deviation.
Section 10. KRS 160.042 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon a merger under the provisions of KRS 160.040 and 160.041 of an independent school district in a city of
the first class with a county school district in counties containing a city of the first class, the members of the
county board of education of the merged county school district, shall be elected pursuant to KRS 160.200 and
160.210.
(2) Each member of the respective boards of education at the time of the merger of the districts, may continue to
hold office until the expiration of his or her term of office, [except as provided in KRS 160.200(4); ]but any
vacancy occurring among such members for any reason shall not be filled.
Section 11. KRS 160.240 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]The general election laws shall apply to all elections of school board members[.
(2) In school districts embracing designated cities, the expense of the election shall be paid by the city from its
general funds. In all other districts the expense shall be paid by the fiscal court out of its general funds.
(3) As used in this section, "designated city" has the same meaning as in KRS 160.020].
Section 12. KRS 304.48-250 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) If the assets of a liability self-insurance group are at any time insufficient to enable the group to discharge its
legal liabilities, other obligations, and to maintain the required reserves under this subtitle, the group shall
immediately levy an assessment upon its members for the amount necessary to make up the deficiency.
(2) If there is a deficiency in any fund year, the deficiency shall be made up immediately, from the following:
(a) Surplus from a fund year other than the current fund year after prior notice of the transfer has been
given to the commissioner;
(b) Administrative funds;
(c) Assessment of membership; or
(d) Alternate methods as the commissioner may direct or approve.
(3) If a liability self-insurance group fails to assess its members within thirty (30) days to make up a deficit, the
commissioner shall order it to do so. This subsection shall not apply to liability self-insurance groups formed
by governmental entities which do not have joint and several liability.
(4) If a liability self-insurance group fails to make the required assessment of its members within thirty (30) days
after the commissioner orders it to do so, or if the deficiency is not fully made up within sixty (60) days after
the date on which the assessment is made, or within a longer period of time as may be permitted by the
commissioner, the group shall be determined to be insolvent and may be placed in delinquency proceedings as
an insurer pursuant to Subtitle 33 of this chapter.
(5) (a) Governmental entities that:
1. Participate or have participated in a liability self-insurance group authorized by this subtitle; and
2. Are assessed by the liability self-insurance group to cover an accrued deficit;
may finance the payment of the assessment over a period not to exceed twenty (20) years.
(b) Financing obtained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection may be accomplished by:
1. The issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations; or
2. A lease, installment payment agreement, or other similar agreement.
(c) If the governmental entity fails to make a scheduled payment on the financing obtained pursuant to
paragraph (a) of this subsection, any payments due to that governmental entity shall be withheld or
intercepted using the process established in KRS 160.160(7)[(6)].
(6) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, all other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes
applying to any financing obtained by a governmental entity shall apply.
Section 13. KRS 304.50-055 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" or "NRSRO" means a credit
rating agency approved by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission to provide assessments of
the creditworthiness of financial instruments.
(2) A workers' compensation self-insured group shall establish plans for premium payment, determination and
collection of assessments, and for declaration and payment of dividends or other disbursements, which shall be
filed for prior approval with the commissioner. Any change in the plans for premium payment, assessments, or
dividends shall be filed for prior approval with the commissioner. Approval of plans for assessments and
dividends does not constitute approval of any particular assessment or dividend by the commissioner.
(3) Prior to the inception of each group member's self-insurance year, the trustees shall collect from that member
at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the estimated premium for the ensuing year, except that in the case of a
self-insured group formed by governmental entities twenty-five percent (25%) of the estimated premium for
the ensuing year shall be collected no later than thirty (30) days after the beginning of the self-insured group's
self-insurance year. The balance of the estimated premium shall be collected in either quarterly or monthly
installments as set forth in the enabling documents described in KRS 304.50-030(2)(b) or 304.50-060(2)(b).
Each group member's payroll shall be audited annually and an adjustment to premium shall be made
accordingly.
(4) A disbursement from a workers' compensation self-insured group fund shall be for a purpose related to the
self-insured group. A dividend shall not be approved or paid until at least thirty-six (36) months after the

CHAPTER 154 13
expiration of the self-insurance year and shall be paid from surplus funds not required for payment of claims or
other liabilities. The dividends shall be paid or credited to members according to the reasonable classifications
the trustees may establish. A dividend shall not be paid which unfairly discriminates between members of the
same classifications. A dividend plan shall specify whether past group members are eligible for the dividend.
Payment of a dividend under a dividend plan shall not be made unless the self-insured group has notified the
commissioner of its intent to make a dividend payment at least thirty (30) days prior to the payment, and the
commissioner has not disapproved the payment within that time.
(5) The formula to be used for collection of assessments shall be determined by the trustees and approved by the
commissioner. Assessments shall be fair and equitable and shall not unfairly discriminate between members of
the same classification.
(6) A trustee, fiscal agent, or service organization shall not utilize an asset of the self-insured group for a purpose
unrelated to workers' compensation. The trustees shall maintain cash or cash equivalent accounts as may be
prudently necessary to pay expenses without having to liquidate long-term investments.
(7) The trustees may invest funds in:
(a) United States Government bonds, United States Treasury notes, Treasury bills, or other direct
obligations guaranteed by the full faith and credit of the United States Government or its agencies;
(b) Tax exempt and taxable obligations issued by any state or any of its agencies, counties, cities,
municipalities, districts, political subdivisions, or other legal authorities within the United States of
America with a minimum rating of "BBB" by any NRSRO, except that no less than fifty percent (50%)
of the investments made under this paragraph shall be in obligations issued by the Commonwealth, its
agencies, or a county, city district, municipality, political subdivision, or other legal authority within the
Commonwealth;
(c) Investment share accounts in a savings and loan association in the Commonwealth whose deposits are
insured by a federal agency;
(d) Certificates of deposit if issued by a duly chartered commercial bank;
(e) 1. At the time of purchase, equity securities actively traded on the New York or NASDAQ Stock
Exchanges or other registered national securities exchanges with no individual equity holding
comprising greater than ten percent (10%) of the equity portion of the portfolio reflected on the
most recent quarterly or annual statement of financial condition on file with the commissioner.
2. An investment in an individual equity holding shall not represent at the time of purchase more
than five percent (5%) of the total market value of the security.
3. At the time of purchase, investments in equity securities shall not exceed twenty percent (20%)
of the total market value of the investment portfolio of the self-insured group reflected on the
most recent quarterly or annual statement of financial condition on file with the commissioner;
(f) Corporate bonds if:
1. The bond is issued, assumed, or guaranteed by a solvent institution created or existing under the
laws of the United States, or a state, province, district, or territory;
2. At the time of purchase, the corporate bond investments do not exceed twenty-five percent (25%)
of the total market value of the investment portfolio reflected on the most recent quarterly or
annual statement of financial condition on file with the commissioner; and
3. The bond has a minimum rating of "BBB" by any NRSRO;
(g) At the time of purchase, mutual funds and exchange traded funds if the investments do not exceed
twenty percent (20%) of the total market value of the investment portfolio reflected on the most recent
quarterly or annual statement of financial condition on file with the commissioner; and
(h) Asset-backed securities if:
1. The bond is issued, assumed, or guaranteed by a solvent institution created or existing under the
laws of the United States, or a state, province, district, or territory;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. The asset-backed security investments do not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total market value
of the investment portfolio reflected on the most recent quarterly or annual statement of financial
condition on file with the commissioner; and
3. The bond has a minimum rating of "BBB" by any NRSRO.
(8) Of the aggregate investments made by the trustees of the self-insured group under this section:
(a) Not less than fifty percent (50%) of the total market value of the entire investment portfolio shall be
held in cash, cash equivalents, or securities as described in subsection (7)(a) to (d) of this section; and
(b) A minimum of five percent (5%) of the total investment portfolio value shall be maintained in cash or
cash equivalent accounts or United States Treasury and Federal Agency Securities with a remaining
maturity of one (1) year or less.
(9) In the event that any security investment authorized by subsection (7) of this section is downgraded below
"BBB," the workers' compensation self-insurance group shall divest itself of that investment as prudently as
possible without incurring unnecessary losses.
(10) The commissioner may permit variation from the requirements of this section for good cause.
(11) (a) Governmental entities that:
1. Participate or have participated in a workers' compensation self-insured group authorized by this
subtitle; and
2. Are assessed by the workers' compensation self-insured group to cover an accrued deficit;
may finance the payment of the assessment over a period not to exceed twenty (20) years.
(b) Financing obtained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection may be accomplished by:
1. The issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations; or
2. A lease, installment payment agreement, or other similar agreement.
(c) If the governmental entity fails to make a scheduled payment on the financing obtained pursuant to
paragraph (a) of this subsection, any payments due to that governmental entity shall be withheld or
intercepted using the process established in KRS 160.160(7)[(6)].
(12) Except as provided in subsection (11) of this section, all other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes
applying to any financing obtained by a governmental entity shall apply.
SECTION 14. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is established a Center of American Civics at the University of Kentucky. The board of trustees for
the University of Kentucky may rename the center consistent with its philanthropic naming governance
procedures.
(2) The center shall:
(a) Foster a deeper understanding of the structures and institutions of federal, state, and local
government;
(b) Further the understanding of the principles and philosophies that contributed to the foundation and
development of the United States and the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(c) Promote civil discourse and constructive debate;
(d) Enhance education in the fields of politics, economics, philosophy, law, American history, American
government, rule of law, and other related fields as appropriate, with a focus on the rights and
responsibilities of American citizenship; fundamental democratic principles; and the ways in which
those principles are expressed in and through our federal, state, and local institutions;
(e) Provide nonpartisan resources to students, faculty, state government agencies, educators, and the
general public regarding civic affairs;
(f) Foster civic engagement through full and fair discussions that promote civil dialogue among those
holding conflicting points of view; and

CHAPTER 154 15
(g) Assist in ensuring that the University of Kentucky serves as a robust marketplace of ideas for all
students and faculty.
(3) In order to carry out the purposes set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the provost of the University of
Kentucky may:
(a) Name an executive director and otherwise establish governance structure for the center;
(b) Develop academic guidelines, course offerings, potential internships and other relevant experiences
for students and the general public;
(c) Facilitate events, including sponsoring public lectures;
(d) Develop a partnership between the center and the Patterson School of Diplomacy at the University of
Kentucky; and
(e) Take other actions as appropriate.
(4) The center may be physically housed in the J. David Rosenberg College of Law on the campus of the
University of Kentucky.
(5) The center shall operate as an independent academic unit within the University of Kentucky.
(6) Any funds appropriated to the center shall not supplant any existing state funding or private or external
donations to the University of Kentucky. Appropriated funds and all private and external donations to the
center may only be used for operation of the center in conformance with this section.
SECTION 15. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The McConnell Center shall be redesignated as an independent academic unit within the University of
Louisville. The University of Louisville shall provide adequate administrative space for the center if space
does not currently exist.
(2) The center shall pursue all of the following goals:
(a) Promote the McConnell Center’s core principles of leadership, scholarship, and service;
(b) Prepare top undergraduate students to become future leaders;
(c) Offer civic education programs for teachers, students, and the public; and
(d) Conduct strategic leadership development for the United States Army.
(3) In order to carry out the purposes set forth in subsection (b), the center is authorized to:
(a) Hire faculty and staff;
(b) Enroll students;
(c) Develop and offer courses in new undergraduate major and minor programs;
(d) Offer general education and honors courses;
(e) Provide and facilitate internships and other relevant experiences for students and the general public;
(f) Hold events, including sponsoring public lectures; and
(g) Take other actions as appropriate, subject to the supervision of the president of the University of
Louisville.
(4) The president of the University of Louisville shall appoint a director of the McConnell Center. The director
shall:
(a) Report to the president of the University of Louisville;
(b) Make all faculty and staff hiring decisions; and
(c) Operate the center in accordance with the policies and procedures of the University of Louisville.
(5) Faculty of the center may be awarded tenure subject to the tenure policies of the University of Louisville as
adopted by the board of trustees and shall not be required to gain joint appointment in another division of
the University of Louisville.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(6) Beginning September 1, 2027, and by each September 1 thereafter, the director shall develop and provide
an annual strategic plan for the center to the president of the University of Louisville and the advisory
board.
(7) Funds appropriated to the center shall not supplant any existing state funding or private or external
donations to the University of Louisville. Appropriated funds and all private and external donations to the
center may only be used for the direct operation of the center.
SECTION 16. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The McConnell Center at the University of Louisville and the Center of American Civics at the University of
Kentucky shall develop materials and curricula for a degree program that meets the requirements of this section
and distribute the materials and curricula developed to each public institution of higher education in this state.
The curricula shall be for a course of instruction that is three (3) semester hours, or the equivalent, in American
government or American history that provides a comprehensive overview of the major events and turning points of
American history and government and, at a minimum, includes:
(1) An understanding of the United States Constitution in its entirety;
(2) An understanding of the Declaration of Independence in its entirety;
(3) An understanding of a minimum of five (5) essays from the Federalist Papers in their entirety as selected by
the course instructor;
(4) An understanding of the Emancipation Proclamation in its entirety;
(5) An understanding of the Gettysburg Address in its entirety; and
(6) Other documents foundational to the American Civil Rights movement.
Section 17. Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, for any large school district that has seven
board of education members on the effective date of this section of this Act, the term of those members shall
terminate on December 31, 2026. All five elected members established under Section 8 of this Act shall be elected at
the next regular election following the effective date of this section of this Act. Within ten days of January 1, 2027,
the superintendent of the school district shall call a meeting of the newly elected board of education for the purpose
of organizing the board of education. Notwithstanding the standard term of office for members of a board of
education, the members initially elected for Division Four and Division Five established in Section 9 of this Act shall
be for a two year term with subsequent terms being a standard four year term. Members initially elected for Divisions
One, Two, and Three established in Section 9 of this Act shall be for a standard four year term.
Section 18. (1) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, for any large school district that has seven
board of education members on the effective date of this section of this Act, the assignment of the seven members to
the five divisions shall be as provided under this section until the five members elected under Section 17 of this Act
take office.
(2) For any division in which:
(a) Only one current board of education member resides, that member shall represent that division;
(b) Two or more current board of education members reside, the member representing that division shall
be selected by drawing lots among those resident members; and
(c) No current board of education member resides, the member representing that division shall be selected
by drawing lots among those members not already representing another division.
(3) Any remaining member shall represent the district at large for the remainder of his or her term.
(4) Any further setting of divisions or setting of the member representing a division shall be conducted in
accordance with Section 8 of this Act and as otherwise provided for in statute.
Section 19. Notwithstanding the eligibility requirements established in subsection (2)(h) of Section 7 of
this Act, a person who was elected or appointed to a board of education prior to the effective date of Section 7 of this
Act shall remain eligible for the office for the remainder of the term to which he or she was elected or appointed. The
person shall not be subsequently eligible to serve a new term on a board of education, or eligible to be a candidate for
election or appointment to a new term on a board of education, unless that person meets all the requirements of
Section 7 of this Act.

CHAPTER 154 17
Section 20. By November 1, 2026, the Kentucky Department of Education shall submit to the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the appropriate interim joint committees a plan for the implementation of each
year of the practicum described in Section 1 of this Act that includes any minimum requirements for successful
completion that the department will require and any statutory amendments the department needs for implementation
of the practicum.
Section 21. Whereas timely elections and appointments are critically important to the operation of large
school districts, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 5 to 13 and Sections 17 to 19 of this Act take effect
upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version